Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4107
Prospective reimbursement, defined.

Prospective reimbursement shall mean a system whereby provider rates are established prior to the period to which they apply and the provider incurs financial risk for costs in excess of the predetermined rates.

Laws 1984, LB 902, § 7.